en: Cooked rabbit meat
fr: Viande de lapin cuite
hr: Kuhano meso kunića
lt: Kepta triušiena

en: Braised rabbit meat
fr: Viande de lapin braisée
hr: Pirjano meso kunića
lt: Troškinta triušiena

en: Wild Rabbit meat
fr: viande de lapin de garenne
hr: Meso divljeg kunića
lt: Laukinio triušio mėsa

en: Cooked wild rabbit meat
fr: Viande de lapin de garenne cuite
hr: Kuhano meso divljeg kunića
lt: Kepta laukinio triušio mėsa

en: Rabbit with mustard sauce
fr: Lapin à la moutarde
hr: Kunić s umakom od senfa
lt: Triušis su garstyčių padažu

en: Rabbit shoulder
fr: Epaule de lapin

en: Frozen rabbit shoulder
fr: Epaule de lapin surgelée

en: Rabbit leg
fr: Cuisse de lapin

en: Frozen rabbit leg
fr: Cuisse de lapin surgelée

en: Rabbit offals
fr: Abats de lapin

en: Frozen rabbit offals
fr: Abats de lapin surgelés

en: Rabbit loin
fr: Longe de lapin

en: Frozen rabbit loin
fr: Longe de lapin surgelée

en: Rabbit liver
fr: Foies de lapin
hr: Zečja jetra
lt: Triušio kepenys

en: Frozen rabbit
fr: Lapin surgelé

en: Horse meat
fr: Viande de cheval

en: Horse fresh meat, Horse raw meat
bg: Прясно конско месо
fr: Viande de cheval fraîche, Viande de cheval crue
hr: Konjsko svježe meso
ja: 馬肉
lt: Arkliena
nl: Verse paardevlezen
zh: 鲜马肉

en: Horse steak
fr: Steak de cheval
hr: Konjski odrezak
lt: Arklienos kepsnys

en: Horse topside
fr: Tende de cheval

en: Horse sirloin steak
fr: Faux-filet de cheval